Tennessee, session 114, SB2635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Tennessee Code Annotated, § 54-5-102, or another law
to the contrary, the segment of East Robertson Road in Robertson County, beginning at the
junction of such route with State Route 25 and ending at the intersection of such route with
State Route 52, is deemed to be of sufficient importance to be included in the general highway
plan of the state. As a result, the route is hereby designated a state route and must receive for
its construction and improvement financial aid under Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 54,
Chapters 1, 2, and 5.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2635
010890
- 1 -